Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-297
Notice of meeting.

(MBCA 8.22) (a) Unless the articles of
incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, regular meetings of the board of
directors may be held without notice of the date, time, place, or purpose
of the meeting.

(b) Unless the articles
of incorporation or bylaws provide for a longer or shorter period, special
meetings of the board of directors must be preceded by at least two days'
notice of the date, time, and place of the meeting. The notice need not describe
the purpose of the special meeting unless required by the articles of incorporation
or bylaws.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 97.